Utah statutes.
15-8-7.   Prohibited practices.
A rental purchase agreement may not contain:
(1)  a confession of judgment;
(2)  a negotiable instrument;
(3)  a claim of a property interest in any goods except those goods delivered
by the lessor pursuant to the rental purchase agreement;
(4)  a wage assignment;
(5)  a waiver by the consumer of claims or defenses;
(6)  a provision authorizing the lessor or a person acting on the lessor's
behalf to enter upon the consumer's premises or to commit any breach of the
peace while repossessing rented property; or
(7)  a provision mandating that the consumer purchase from the lessor
insurance or a liability damage waiver for the merchandise.
